Virginia statutes. Title 8.2A. Commercial Code—Leases.
PART 5. Default.
§ 8.2A-529.
Lessor’s action for the rent.

After default by the lessee under the lease contract of the type described in subsection (1) of §

8.2A-523

or subdivision (3) (a) of §

8.2A-523

or, if agreed, after other default by the lessee, if the lessor complies with subsection (2) of this section, the lessor may recover from the lessee as damages:

For goods accepted by the lessee and not repossessed by or tendered to the lessor, and for conforming goods lost or damaged within a commercially reasonable time after risk of loss passes to the lessee (§

8.2A-219

), (i) accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of entry of judgment in favor of the lessor, (ii) the present value as of the same date of the rent for the then remaining lease term of the lease agreement, and (iii) any incidental damages allowed under §

8.2A-530

, less expenses saved in consequence of the lessee’s default; and

For goods identified to the lease contract if the lessor is unable after reasonable effort to dispose of them at a reasonable price or the circumstances reasonably indicate that effort will be unavailing, (i) accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of entry of judgment in favor of the lessor, (ii) the present value as of the same date of the rent for the then remaining lease term of the lease agreement, and (iii) any incidental damages allowed under §

8.2A-530

, less expenses saved in consequence of the lessee’s default.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the lessor shall hold for the lessee for the remaining lease term of the lease agreement any goods that have been identified to the lease contract and are in the lessor’s control.

The lessor may dispose of the goods at any time before collection of the judgment for damages obtained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If the disposition is before the end of the remaining lease term of the lease agreement, the lessor’s recovery against the lessee for damages will be governed by §

8.2A-527

or §

8.2A-528

, and the lessor will cause an appropriate credit to be provided against a judgment for damages to the extent that the amount of the judgment exceeds the recovery available pursuant to §

8.2A-527

or §

8.2A-528

.

Payment of the judgment for damages obtained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section entitles the lessee to use and possession of the goods not then disposed of for the remaining lease term of the lease agreement.

After a lessee has wrongfully rejected or revoked acceptance of goods, has failed to pay rent then due, or has repudiated (§

8.2A-402

), a lessor who is held not entitled to rent under this section shall nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under §§

8.2A-527

and

8.2A-528

.

History.

1991, c. 536.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Lessor entitled to unpaid rent. —

As a lessee materially breached the contract by not paying money due under the lease and by not paying for damage the lessee’s son caused to the race car, the lessor was entitled to the remedies set forth in §§

8.2A-523

through

8.2A-529

, including unpaid rent and costs for damage to the race car. Gelles Racing, Inc. v. Ferris, 75 Va. Cir. 273, 2008 Va. Cir. LEXIS 84 (Fairfax County June 24, 2008).

§ 8.2A-530.
Lessor’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved lessor include any commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care and custody of goods after the lessee’s default, in connection with return or disposition of the goods, or otherwise resulting from the default.

History.

1991, c. 536.

§ 8.2A-531.
Standing to sue third parties for injury to goods.

If a third party so deals with goods that have been identified to a lease contract as to cause actionable injury to a party to the lease contract (a) the lessor has a right of action against the third party, and (b) the lessee also has a right of action against the third party if the lessee:

If at the time of the injury the party plaintiff did not bear the risk of loss as against the other party to the lease contract and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the recovery, his suit or settlement, subject to his own interest, is as a fiduciary for the other party to the lease contract.

Either party with the consent of the other may sue for the benefit of whom it may concern.

Has a security interest in the goods;

Has an insurable interest in the goods; or

Bears the risk of loss under the lease contract or has since the injury assumed that risk as against the lessor and the goods have been converted or destroyed.

History.

1991, c. 536.

§ 8.2A-532.
Lessor’s rights to residual interest.

In addition to any other recovery permitted by this title or other law, the lessor may recover from the lessee an amount that will fully compensate the lessor for any loss of or damage to the lessor’s residual interest in the goods caused by the default of the lessee.

History.

1991, c. 536.